Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.140

Participation in federal act authorized.

Any development credit corporation desiring to qualify and participate in the federal Small Business Investment Act of 1958 and as hereafter amended may do so and to that end may comply with all the laws of the United States and all the rules, regulations and requirements promulgated pursuant thereto.

[ 1959 c 213 s 14.]